languages/apertium-gla/apertium-gla.gla.dix
    <pardef n="/do__pos">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>do</l><r>do<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>d'</l><r>do<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>do</l><r>do<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a__pos">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ar__pos">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/an__pos">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>an</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="aon__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dà__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <pardef n="d/uine__n_m">
      <e><p><l>uine</l><r>uine<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uine</l><r>uine<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uine</l><r>uine<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aoine</l><r>uine<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aoine</l><r>uine<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aoine</l><r>uine<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dh/uine__n_m">
      <e><par n="d/uine__n_m"/><p><l></l><r><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uine</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aoine</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/ear__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ear</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ear</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ear</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fh/ear__n_m">
      <e><par n="f/ear__n_m"/><p><l></l><r><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>earaibh</l><r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fios__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fhios__n_m">
      <e><par n="fios__n_m"/><p><l></l><r><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tao/bh__n_m">
      <e><p><l>bh</l><r>bh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bh</l><r>bh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ibh</l><r>bh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bhan</l><r>bh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bhan</l><r>bh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bhan</l><r>bh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thao/bh__n_m">
      <e><par n="tao/bh__n_m"/><p><l></l><r><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>bh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>bh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="caile/ag__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ag</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ig</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ig</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ige</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>agan</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>agan</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>agan</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="chaile/ag__n_f">
      <e><par n="caile/ag__n_f"/><p><l></l><r><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ag</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>agan</l><r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="àite__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bùth__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bhùth__n_f">
      <e><par n="bùth__n_f"/><p><l></l><r><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bliadhna__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichean</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichean</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichean</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="do"><i></i><par n="/do__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="ar__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="ur"><i>ur</i><par n="ar__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><i></i><par n="/an__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="aon"><i>aon</i><par n="aon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dà"><i>dà</i><par n="dà__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fear"><p><l>f</l><r>f</r></p><par n="f/ear__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fear"><p><l>fh</l><r>f</r></p><par n="fh/ear__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="caileag"><p><l>caile</l><r>caile</r></p><par n="caile/ag__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="caileag"><p><l>chaile</l><r>caile</r></p><par n="chaile/ag__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="duine"><p><l>d</l><r>d</r></p><par n="d/uine__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="duine"><p><l>dh</l><r>d</r></p><par n="d/uine__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fios"><p><l>fios</l><r>fios</r></p><par n="fios__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fios"><p><l>fhios</l><r>fios</r></p><par n="fhios__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="taobh"><p><l>tao</l><r>tao</r></p><par n="tao/bh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="taobh"><p><l>thao</l><r>thao</r></p><par n="thao/bh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="àite"><p><l>àite</l><r>àite</r></p><par n="àite__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bliadhna"><p><l>bliadhna</l><r>bliadhna</r></p><par n="bliadhna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bùth"><p><l>bùth</l><r>bùth</r></p><par n="bùth__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bùth"><p><l>bhùth</l><r>bùth</r></p><par n="bhùth__n_f"/></e>
